New York, session 2025-2026, S5532.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 121-b of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by 2 chapter 160 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 121-b. Limited use motorcycle. (a) A limited use vehicle having only 4 two or three wheels, with a seat or saddle for the operator. A limited 5 use motorcycle having a maximum performance speed, of more than thirty 6 miles per hour but not more than forty miles per hour shall be a class A 7 limited use motorcycle. A limited use motorcycle having a maximum 8 performance speed of more than twenty miles per hour but not more than 9 thirty miles per hour, shall be a class B limited use motorcycle. A 10 limited use motorcycle having a maximum performance speed of not more 11 than twenty miles per hour shall be a class C limited use motorcycle. 12 (b) A class three bicycle with electric assist as defined in subdivi- 13 sion (c) of section one hundred two-c of this article. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 16 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 17 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 18 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09570-02-5